Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1773.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE VIII-AADULT USE CANNABISSection 801-A. Purpose, findings and declarations.(a) Findings and declarations.--In the interest of the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 efficient use of law enforcement resources, enhancing revenue for public purposes and individual freedom, the people of this Commonwealth find and declare that the use of cannabis should be legal for individuals who are at least 21 years of age and should be taxed.(b) Additional findings and declarations.--In the interest of the health and public safety of our citizenry, the people of this Commonwealth further find and declare that cannabis should be regulated in a manner similar to alcohol so that:(1) individuals will have to show proof of age before purchasing cannabis;(2) selling, distributing or transferring cannabis to minors and other individuals under 21 years of age shall remain illegal;(3) driving under the influence of cannabis shall remain illegal;(4) legitimate, State-operated stores and not criminal actors will conduct sales of cannabis; and(5) cannabis sold in this Commonwealth will be labeled and subject to additional regulations to ensure that consumers are informed and protected.(c) Industrial hemp.--In the interest of enacting rational policies for the treatment of all variations of the cannabis plant, the people of this Commonwealth further find and declare that industrial hemp should be regulated separately from strains of cannabis with higher delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) concentrations.(d) Matters of Statewide concern.--The people of this Commonwealth further find and declare that it is necessary to ensure consistency and fairness in the application of this 20250HB1773PN2181 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 article throughout this Commonwealth and that, therefore, the matters addressed by this article are, except as specified in this article, matters of Statewide concern.Section 802-A. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Adult use cannabis." Cannabis ingested for any reason other than medical purposes."Cannabis." The plant of the genus cannabis whether growing or not, the parts and seeds thereof, the resin extracted from any part of the plant and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of the plant, and the plant's seeds or resin, including cannabis concentrate. The term does not include industrial hemp or fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, sterilized seed of the plant that is incapable of germination or the weight of another ingredient combined with cannabis to prepare topical or oral administrations, food, drink or other product."Cannabis accessories." Equipment, products or materials that are used, intended or designed for use in planting, propagating, cultivating, growing, harvesting, composting, manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, repackaging, storing, vaporizing or containing cannabis or for ingesting, inhaling or otherwise introducing cannabis into the human body."Cannabis cultivation facility." An entity licensed to cultivate, prepare and package cannabis and sell cannabis to a retail cannabis store, cannabis product manufacturing facility and other cannabis cultivation facility, but not to a consumer.20250HB1773PN2181 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Cannabis establishment." A cannabis cultivation facility, a cannabis testing facility and a cannabis product manufacturing facility."Cannabis product." A concentrated cannabis product and a cannabis product that is comprised of cannabis and other ingredients and is intended for use or consumption, including as an edible product, ointment or tincture."Cannabis product manufacturing facility." An entity licensed to:(1) purchase cannabis;(2) manufacture, prepare and package cannabis products; and(3) sell cannabis and cannabis products to other cannabis product manufacturing facilities and retail cannabis stores, but not to a consumer."Cannabis testing facility." An entity licensed to analyze and certify the safety and potency of cannabis."Consumer." An individual who is at least 21 years of age and purchases cannabis or cannabis products for personal use and not for resale to others."Industrial hemp." The plant of the genus cannabis and any part of the plant, whether growing or not, with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration (THC) that does not exceed 0.03% on a dry-weight basis."Locality." A county, municipality or city of this Commonwealth."Pennsylvania farm." An agricultural business incorporated as a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company or Pennsylvania S corporation that operates an area of land and building used for growing crops and rearing animals.20250HB1773PN2181 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Retail cannabis store." A retail establishment operated by the board as provided under section 805-A.Section 803-A. Personal use of cannabis.Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following acts are not unlawful and are not an offense under the laws of this Commonwealth or the law of a locality within this Commonwealth or a basis for seizure or forfeiture of an asset under Commonwealth law for an individual who is at least 21 years of age:(1) Possessing, using, displaying, purchasing or transporting cannabis accessories or cannabis.(2) (i) Possessing, growing, processing or transporting not more than six cannabis plants, including mature, flowering plants.(ii) Possessing the cannabis produced by the plants under subparagraph (i) on the premises where the plants were grown, if the growing takes place in an enclosed, locked space and is not conducted openly or publicly, and the cannabis is not made available for sale.(3) Transferring of one ounce or less of cannabis without remuneration to an individual who is at least 21 years of age.(4) Consuming cannabis, provided that nothing in this section shall be construed to permit consumption that is conducted openly and publicly or in a manner that endangers others.(5) Assisting another individual who is at least 21 years of age in an act described in paragraph (1), (2), (3) or (4).Section 804-A. Lawful operation of cannabis-related facilities.20250HB1773PN2181 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The following acts are not unlawful and are not an offense under the laws of this Commonwealth or a basis for seizure or forfeiture of an asset under Commonwealth law for an individual who is at least 21 years of age:(1) Manufacture, possession or purchase of a cannabis accessory or the sale of a cannabis accessory to an individual who is at least 21 years of age.(2) Any of the following:(i) Possessing, displaying or transporting cannabis or a cannabis product.(ii) Purchasing cannabis from a cannabis cultivation facility.(iii) Purchasing cannabis or a cannabis product from a cannabis product manufacturing facility.(iv) Selling cannabis or a cannabis product to a consumer, if:(A) the individual conducting the activity described in this paragraph acts in the capacity of an employee or agent of a retail cannabis store or the board; and(B) the retail cannabis store utilizes a transaction scan device to verify the age of any individual who appears to be less than 35 years of age before making a sale of cannabis products.(3) Any of the following:(i) Cultivating, harvesting, processing, packaging, transporting, displaying or possessing cannabis.(ii) Delivering or transferring cannabis to a cannabis testing facility.(iii) Selling cannabis to a cannabis cultivation 20250HB1773PN2181 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facility, a cannabis product manufacturing facility or a retail cannabis store.(iv) Purchasing cannabis from a cannabis cultivation facility, if the person conducting the activity described in this paragraph has obtained a current, valid license to operate a cannabis cultivation facility or acts in the capacity of an owner, employee or agent of a licensed cannabis cultivation facility.(4) Any of the following:(i) Packaging, processing, transporting, manufacturing, displaying or possessing cannabis or cannabis products.(ii) Delivering or transferring cannabis or a cannabis product to a cannabis testing facility.(iii) Selling cannabis or a cannabis product to a retail cannabis store or a cannabis product manufacturing facility.(iv) Purchasing cannabis from a cannabis cultivation facility.(v) Purchasing cannabis or a cannabis product from a cannabis product manufacturing facility, if the individual conducting the activities described in this paragraph has obtained a current, valid license to operate a cannabis product manufacturing facility or acts in the capacity of an owner, employee or agent of a licensed cannabis product manufacturing facility.(5) Possessing, cultivating, processing, repackaging, storing, transporting, displaying, transferring or delivering cannabis or cannabis products, if the person has obtained a current, valid license to operate a cannabis testing facility 20250HB1773PN2181 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or acts in the capacity of an owner, employee or agent of a licensed cannabis testing facility.(6) Leasing or otherwise allowing the use of property owned, occupied or controlled by a person, corporation or other entity for an activity conducted lawfully in accordance with paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4) or (5).Section 805-A. General powers of board.In addition to sections 207 and 208, the board has the following powers and duties:(1) Buy, import or have in the board's possession for sale, and sell cannabis and cannabis products in the manner provided in this article, provided the purchases are made subject to the approval of the State Treasurer or the State Treasurer's designated deputy. The board shall buy cannabis and cannabis products at the lowest price and in the greatest variety reasonably obtainable.(2) Control the manufacture, possession, sale, consumption, importation, use, storage, transportation and delivery of cannabis and cannabis products in accordance with the provisions of this act and fix the wholesale and retail prices at which cannabis and cannabis products may be sold at retail cannabis stores, as follows:(i) Prices must be proportional with prices paid by the board to the board's suppliers and reflect any advantage obtained through volume purchases by the board.(ii) The board may establish a preferential price structure for cannabis produced within this Commonwealth for the promotion of the cannabis.(iii) The board may not purchase cannabis or a cannabis product that is produced in a state, territory 20250HB1773PN2181 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or country prohibiting the importation of cannabis or a cannabis product that is produced in this Commonwealth.(3) Determine the municipalities within which retail cannabis stores shall be established and the locations of the stores within the municipalities.(4) Through the Department of General Services as the board's agent, lease, furnish and equip buildings, rooms and other accommodations as required for the operation of this article.(5) Appoint, fix the compensation and define the powers and duties of the managers, officers, inspectors, examiners, clerks and other employees as required for the operation of this article, subject to the provisions of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, and 71 Pa.C.S. Pt. III (relating to civil service reform).(6) Determine the nature, form and capacity of the packages and original containers to be used for containing cannabis and cannabis products.(7) Perform any other act deemed necessary or advisable for the purpose of carrying into effect this article and the regulations promulgated under this article.(8) Periodically promulgate regulations that are consistent with this article as the board may deem necessary for the efficient administration of this article. The board shall publish regulations throughout this Commonwealth in the manner the board deems necessary and advisable or as may be provided by law.(9) By regulation, provide for the use of a computerized referral system to assist consumers in locating special items 20250HB1773PN2181 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 at retail cannabis stores and for the use of electronic transfer of funds and credit cards for the purchase of cannabis and cannabis products at retail cannabis stores.(10) Issue grants to various entities for cannabis education and prevention efforts.Section 806-A. Regulation of cannabis.(a) Regulations.--Not later than two years after the effective date of this subsection, the board shall adopt regulations necessary for implementation of this article. The regulations may not prohibit the operation of a cannabis establishment, either expressly or through a regulation that makes the operation unreasonably impracticable. The regulations shall include:(1) Procedures for the issuance, renewal, suspension and revocation of a license to operate a cannabis establishment.(2) A schedule of application and licensing fees, including an annual $700 license renewal surcharge, provided that an application fee may not exceed $5,000 with the upper limit adjusted annually for inflation, unless the board determines a greater fee is necessary to carry out the board's responsibilities under this section.(3) Qualifications for licensure that are directly and demonstrably related to the operation of a cannabis establishment.(4) Security requirements for a cannabis establishment.(5) Requirements to prevent the sale or diversion of cannabis and a cannabis product to an individual who is less than 21 years of age.(6) Labeling requirements for cannabis and a cannabis product sold or distributed by a cannabis establishment.20250HB1773PN2181 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) Health and safety regulations and standards for the manufacture of a cannabis product and the cultivation of cannabis.(8) Restrictions on the advertising and display of cannabis and a cannabis product.(9) Civil penalties for the failure to comply with regulations promulgated under this section.(b) Individual privacy.--Notwithstanding subsection (a), the board may not require a consumer to provide a retail cannabis store with personal information other than government-issued identification to determine the consumer's age, and a retail cannabis store may not be required to acquire and record personal information about a consumer other than information typically acquired in a financial transaction conducted at a retail liquor store.(c) Taxation of adult use cannabis and cannabis products.--(1) A gross receipts tax is imposed on the gross receipts of a cannabis cultivation facility received from the sale of adult use cannabis or cannabis products by a cannabis cultivation facility to another cannabis cultivation facility, cannabis product manufacturing facility or retail cannabis store, to be paid by the cannabis cultivation facility at the rate of 10%. The tax shall be charged against and be paid by the cannabis cultivation facility and shall not be added as a separate charge or line item on any sales slip, invoice, receipt or other statement or memorandum of the price paid.(2) The tax under paragraph (1) shall not be levied on a cannabis cultivation facility that partners with a Pennsylvania farm to grow or process cannabis for the 20250HB1773PN2181 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cannabis cultivation facility.(3) An excise tax is imposed at the point of sale of adult use cannabis or cannabis products at the rate of 19%. A person required to collect the tax shall clearly provide notice of the assessment of the tax to the consumer through advertising or separate listing on a sales receipt or invoice.(4) The taxes imposed under this subsection shall be administered in the same manner as the tax imposed under Article XI of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, except that estimated tax payments under section 3003.2 of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 shall not be required. A cannabis cultivation facility shall make quarterly payments under this section for each calendar quarter at the rate prescribed in this subsection on the gross receipts for the calendar quarter. The tax shall be due and payable on the 20th day of January, April, July and October for the preceding calendar quarter on a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue.(5) The Department of Revenue shall deposit 100% of all money received from the tax imposed under this subsection into the General Fund.(d) Locality.--A locality shall enact an ordinance or regulation:(1) Specifying the entity within the locality that is responsible for processing applications submitted for a license to operate a cannabis establishment within the boundaries of the locality.(2) For the issuance of licenses should the issuance by the locality become necessary because of:20250HB1773PN2181 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) a failure by the board to adopt regulations under subsection (a); or(ii) a failure by the board to process and issue licenses as required by subsection (f).(e) Ordinance or regulation.--A locality may enact an ordinance or regulation, not in conflict with this section or with a regulation promulgated under this section, which:(1) Governs the time, place, manner and number of cannabis establishment operations.(2) Establishes procedures for the issuance, suspension and revocation of a license issued by the locality.(3) Establishes a schedule of annual operating, licensing and application fees for cannabis establishments, provided the application fees are only due if applications are submitted to a locality and a licensing fee is only due if a license is issued by a locality.(4) Establishes civil penalties for violation of an ordinance or regulation governing the time, place and manner of a cannabis establishment that may operate in the locality.(f) License application.--Each application for an annual license to operate a cannabis establishment must be submitted to the board. The board shall:(1) Accept and process applications beginning on the date that occurs three months after the promulgation of the regulations in accordance with section 806-A(a).(2) Immediately forward a copy of an application and half of the license application fee to the locality in which the applicant desires to operate the cannabis establishment.(3) Issue an annual license to the applicant between 45 and 90 days after receipt of an application, unless the board 20250HB1773PN2181 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 finds the applicant is not in compliance with regulations enacted under subsection (a) or the board is notified by the relevant locality that the applicant is not in compliance with ordinances and regulations in effect at the time of application. If a locality enacted a limit on the number of cannabis establishments in the locality and a greater number of applicants seek licenses in the locality, the board shall solicit and consider input from the locality as to the locality's preference or preferences for licensure.(4) Upon denial of an application, notify the applicant in writing of the specific reason for the denial.(g) Resubmission of application to locality.--(1) If the board does not issue a license to an applicant within 90 days of receipt of the application filed and does not notify the applicant of the specific reason for the denial, in writing and within the time period, the applicant may resubmit the application directly to the locality, and the locality may issue an annual license to the applicant.(2) A locality issuing a license to an applicant shall do so no later than 90 days after receipt of the resubmitted application unless the locality finds and notifies the applicant that the applicant is not in compliance with ordinances and regulations in effect at the time the application is resubmitted, and the locality shall notify the board if an annual license has been issued to the applicant.(3) If an application is submitted to a locality under this subsection, the board shall forward to the locality the application fee paid by the applicant to the board upon request by the locality.20250HB1773PN2181 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) A license issued by a locality in accordance with this subsection has the same force and effect as a license issued by the board, and the holder of the license is not subject to regulation or enforcement by the board during the term of the license.(5) A subsequent or renewed license may be issued under this subsection on an annual basis only upon resubmission to the locality of a new application submitted to the board.(6) This subsection shall not be construed to limit the relief available to an aggrieved party.Section 807-A. Diversity goals.(a) Goals.--It is the intent and goal of the General Assembly that the board promote diversity and the participation by diverse groups in the activities authorized under this article. In order to further this goal, the board shall adopt and implement policies to ensure that:(1) Diverse groups are accorded equal opportunity in the licensing process.(2) Licensees promote the participation of diverse groups in operations by affording equal access to employment opportunities.(b) Duties of board.--To facilitate participation by diverse groups in the activities authorized under this article, the board shall:(1) Conduct necessary and appropriate outreach, including, if necessary, consulting with other Commonwealth agencies to identify diverse groups who may qualify for participation in activities under this article.(2) Provide sufficient and continuous notice of the participation opportunities afforded under this article by 20250HB1773PN2181 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 publishing notice on the board's publicly accessible Internet website.(3) Include in the applications for license under this article language to encourage applicants to utilize and give consideration to diverse groups for contracting or professional services opportunities.(c) Reports.--No later than the first March 1 that occurs at least eight months after the promulgation of the regulations in accordance with section 806-A(a), and each March 1 thereafter, the board shall submit a report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Law and Justice Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Liquor Control Committee of the House of Representatives summarizing the participation and utilization of diverse groups in the activities authorized under this article. The report shall include:(1) The participation level, by percentage, of diverse groups in the activities authorized under this article.(2) A summary of how diverse groups are utilized by licensees, including in the provision of goods or services.(3) Any other information the board deems appropriate.(d) Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this section shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Disadvantaged business." As defined in 74 Pa.C.S. § 303(b) (relating to diverse business participation)."Diverse group." A disadvantaged business, minority-owned business, women-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned small business or veteran-owned small business that has been certified by a third-party certifying organization.20250HB1773PN2181 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Minority-owned business." As defined in 74 Pa.C.S. § 303(b)."Service-disabled veteran-owned small business." As defined in 51 Pa.C.S. § 9601 (relating to definitions)."Third-party certifying organization." As defined in 74 Pa.C.S. § 303(b)."Veteran-owned small business." As defined in 51 Pa.C.S. § 9601."Women-owned business." As defined in 74 Pa.C.S. § 303(b).Section 808-A. Cannabis clean slate.(a) Expungement authorized.--A person who has been arrested for, charged with or convicted under section 13(a)(31) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, shall have the person's criminal history related to the criminal proceeding expunged in accordance with subsection (b).(b) Expungement process.--(1) The Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts shall, no later than six months after the effective date of this section, transmit to the Pennsylvania State Police central repository all records related to an arrest or conviction under subsection (a) for expungement.(2) If the Pennsylvania State Police determines a record transmitted under paragraph (1) is not eligible for expungement, the Pennsylvania State Police shall notify the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts of the determination no later than 30 days after receiving the information.(3) Upon expiration of the 30-day period, the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts shall provide to 20250HB1773PN2181 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the court of common pleas in which the arrest or adjudication occurred a list of all records eligible for expungement.(4) No later than 30 days after receiving the list, the court of common pleas shall order the expungement of all criminal history records received under this section and all administrative records of the Department of Transportation relating to the criminal history records received under this section.(c) Release of inmates.--A court of common pleas that has received an expungement order for a person currently incarcerated for the crime for which the court received the expungement order shall transmit to the appropriate county correctional institution or State correctional institution, as defined under 61 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions), an order for the immediate release or discharge of the person whose record has been ordered to be expunged.(d) Motor vehicle operation privileges.--The Bureau of Motor Vehicles shall reinstate a person's suspended or revoked motor vehicle operation privileges that were suspended or revoked as a result of a person's conviction that has been expunged under this section.(e) Reinstatement of license or registration.--A license or registration that has been suspended or revoked under section 23 of The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act due to an arrest or conviction that has been expunged under this section shall be reinstated.Section 809-A. Employment provisions.(a) Cannabis in workplace.--An employer shall not be required to permit or accommodate the use, consumption, possession, transfer, display, transportation, sale or growing 20250HB1773PN2181 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of cannabis in the workplace.(b) Random drug tests.--A random drug test showing the mere presence of a nonintoxicating level of cannabis may not be the basis of the termination of employment or any other disciplinary action against the employee.(c) Construction.--Nothing in this article shall be construed to affect the ability of an employer to adopt and enforce policies restricting the use of cannabis by employees in the workplace.Section 2. Repeals are as follows:The General Assembly declares that the repeals under this section are necessary to effectuate the addition of Article VIII-A of the act:(i) Section 4(1)(iii)16 and (iv) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, are repealed.(ii) Section 13(a)(30) and (31) of The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with Article VIII-A of the act.(iii) All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with this act.Section 3. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The addition of sections 801-A, 802-A and 806-A(a) of the act shall take effect immediately.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect upon the promulgation of the regulations in accordance with section 806-A(a) of the act.20250HB1773PN2181 - 19 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829